Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-473
Malingering.

Any person subject to this code who for the purpose of avoiding work, duty or service:

(1) Feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse or derangement; or

(2) Intentionally inflicts self-injury, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 73, p. 1579.